Massachusetts, session 194th, S919.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 15E of chapter 15A of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following sentence at the end of the second
paragraph:- A community college shall be eligible to receive said match for any private
donations received by its foundation, regardless of whether said funds are endowed or
contributed to a capital outlay program.
SECTION 2. Said section 15E of said chapter 15A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out the word “Private” in the third paragraph, and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- Except for the community colleges, private
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.
of 1